Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1257.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Small Necessities Leave Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Bureau." The Bureau of Labor Law Compliance within the department."Child." A child of an employee or of the employee's domestic partner whether by blood, marriage, adoption, foster arrangement, custody agreement, whether full, partial or no physical custody agreement is formally or informally in effect, 12345678910111213141516171819 or guardianship, that is a student enrolled in a school or early intervention learning program maintained as a part of the Statewide comprehensive education system in this Commonwealth and is:(1) under three years of age with an active IFSP developed for the coordination of early intervention services and support to be provided for the early intervention of the child;(2) preschool age from the earliest admission age to preschool until admission to a kindergarten program;(3) compulsory school age as defined in section 1326 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949; or(4) no more than 21 years of age with an active IEP at the start of a school year that the student is enrolled."Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Early intervention services." Developmental services as defined in the act of December 19, 1990 (P.L.1372, No.212), known as the Early Intervention Services System Act."Elderly relative." An individual of at least 60 years of age who is related to an employee by blood, marriage or domestic partnership."Eligible employee." An employee who has been employed for at least 12 months at the time the leave is to begin and has worked for at least 1,250 hours during the 12-month period prior to the beginning of the leave. The term does not include an employee covered by a collective bargaining agreement if the agreement expressly provides for paid leave, paid sick leave or paid time off.20260SB1257PN1559 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Employer." An individual, partnership, association, corporation, business trust or any person or group of persons acting directly or indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an employee."Guardianship." An arrangement with a fiduciary who provides care and management of a child, regardless of whether the arrangement is educational, court appointed, surrogacy or otherwise."IEP." An individualized education plan developed in accordance with 22 Pa. Code § 14.131 (relating to IEP) and the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (Public Law 91-230, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq.)."IFSP." An individualized family service plan as defined in 55 Pa. Code Ch. 4226 (relating to early intervention services) and the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act."School." The following:(1) A public or private elementary or secondary school.(2) An intermediate unit.(3) A Head Start program under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 105 Subch. II (relating to Head Start programs).(4) An approved private provider engaged in providing early intervention services under 55 Pa. Code Ch. 4226.(5) A child care center licensed under Article X of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code.Section 3. Small necessities leave.(a) Leave requirement.--An employer shall provide a total of 24 hours of paid leave to an eligible employee during any 12-month period, in addition to leave available under Federal law, for, at a minimum, the following purposes:20260SB1257PN1559 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Participate in school activities directly related to the educational advancement of a child of the eligible employee.(2) Accompany a child of the eligible employee to medical or dental appointments.(3) Accompany an elderly relative of the eligible employee to medical or dental appointments or appointments for other professional services related to the elderly relative's care.(b) Protections.--An employer may not deprive an eligible employee of employment, seniority position or benefits or threaten or otherwise coerce the eligible employee with respect to employment, seniority position or benefits because of the use of leave under this section.(c) Limitations.--(1) An eligible employee may elect, or an employer may require the eligible employee to substitute, the accrued paid vacation leave, personal leave or medical or sick leave of the employee for any leave provided under this section.(2) Nothing in this section shall require an employer to provide paid sick leave or paid medical leave in a situation in which the employer would not normally provide paid sick leave or paid medical leave.(3) Leave under this section may be taken intermittently or on a reduced leave schedule.(4) An employer shall provide payment for leave taken under this section no later than the payday for the next regular payroll period after the leave was used.(5) An employer is not required to provide compensation to an employee for accrued, unused paid leave under this 20260SB1257PN1559 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section upon termination, resignation, retirement or other separation from employment.(d) Notice.--If the necessity for leave under this section is foreseeable, the eligible employee shall provide the employer with not less than seven days' notice before the date the leave is to begin. If the necessity for leave is not foreseeable, the employee shall provide notice as is practicable.(e) Certification.--An employer may require that a request for leave under this section be supported by documentation of treatment or care under subsection (a)(2) and (3) or documentation or a certification issued at a time and in a manner as the department may require by regulation.(f) Enforcement.--The bureau shall be responsible for the administration and enforcement of the protections of an employee under this act through an expedited process developed by the bureau for, at a minimum, the review of an employer's denial of benefits under this act.(g) Regulations.--The department may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement and administer this act.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1257PN1559 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021